Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 100 Dual Enrollment Equal Opportunity Act

16-100-1.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Dual Enrollment Equal Opportunity Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 199, § 1.

16-100-2.
Definition.

“Dual Enrollment” means that a student is enrolled in a secondary school while simultaneously enrolled part-time or full-time at a local institution of higher learning, such as a community college or university.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 199, § 1.

16-100-3.
Policy implemented.

The board of education shall prescribe by regulation a statewide dual enrollment policy that shall allow students to enroll in courses at postsecondary institutions to satisfy academic credit requirements in both high school and the aforementioned postsecondary institutions. The regulations shall address the postsecondary institution’s graduation requirements, if any; the institution’s ability to award degrees/certificates in Rhode Island; the minimum course grade to receive credit at the student’s secondary school; and any other criteria that the board deems appropriate.

The board shall convene a workgroup, including, but not limited to, representatives from the department of elementary and secondary education, the office of the postsecondary commissioner, superintendents, school committees, public higher education institutions, guidance counselors, and teachers. The purpose of the workgroup is to consider and advise the board as to a dual enrollment policy and its possible effect on school funding pursuant to chapter 7.2 of this title; academic supports; transportation; possible shared costs of the education; possible fee schedules; manners in which low-income students could access the program; and possible contracted tuition costs with our public higher education institutions.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, payments to public institutions of higher education for dual and concurrent enrollment shall be limited to no greater than the appropriation contained in the appropriations act. On or before September 30, 2017, the council on postsecondary education shall promulgate rules and regulations enforcing this limitation.

Students in grade twelve (12) enrolled full-time, as defined by the institution, in a dual enrollment program where the courses are taken on a higher education institution campus shall be exempt from the requirements set forth in §

16-22-4(a)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 199, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 302, art. 12, § 3; P.L. 2019, ch. 237, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 247, § 2.

16-100-4.
Dual enrollment adoption.

School districts and schools must adopt the statewide dual enrollment policy promulgated pursuant to this section by June 30, 2015. All school districts, charter schools, career and technical schools, approved private day or residential schools and collaborative schools shall be subject to the requirements of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 199, § 1.

16-100-5.
Reporting.

School districts that have students participating in dual enrollment programs shall report to the department of elementary and secondary education on an annual basis regarding the number of students, the number of credits enrolled in at postsecondary institutions, the name of the institution, and the dollar amount the school district is allocated for this program. The department of elementary and secondary education shall provide the governor, president of the senate and speaker of the house a report that shall contain the above information provided by district and in the aggregate on an annual basis by October 31 of each year, commencing on July 1, 2016.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 199, § 1.